New York, session 2025-2026, S8847.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 3005-a of the public health law, 2 as amended by chapter 445 of the laws of 1993, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. The following staffing standards shall be in effect unless other- 5 wise provided by this section: 6 (a) effective January first, nineteen hundred ninety-seven the minimum 7 staffing standard for a registered ambulance service shall be a certi- 8 fied first responder with the patient; 9 (b) effective January first, two thousand, the minimum staffing stand- 10 ard for a voluntary ambulance service shall be an emergency medical 11 technician with the patient; 12 (c) (i) the minimum staffing standard for ambulance units responding 13 to calls for emergency medical services in the 911 system in a city with 14 a population of over one million people shall be (1) a team of two 15 certified emergency medical technicians; or (2) a team of two certified 16 advanced emergency medical technicians. 17 (ii) the minimum standard for staffing supervisors' vehicles respond- 18 ing to calls for emergency medical services in the 911 system in a city 19 with a population of over one million people shall be a team of one 20 supervisor who is certified either as an emergency medical technician or 21 as an advanced emergency medical technician, paired with one certified 22 emergency medical technician or advanced emergency medical technician; 23 (d) the minimum staffing standard for all other ambulance services 24 shall be an emergency medical technician with the patient; and 25 [(d)] (e) the minimum staffing standard for an advanced life support 26 first response service shall be an advanced emergency medical technician EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11189-04-5 S. 8847 2 1 with the patient. Circumstances permitting other than advanced life 2 support care by an advanced life support first response service may be 3 established by rule by the state council, subject to the approval of the 4 commissioner. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.